Alabama, session 2026rs, HB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) ALEA. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
(2) CONVICTED or CONVICTION. All of the following:
a. A verdict of guilty by a judge or jury.
b. A plea of guilty.
c. A plea of nolo contendere or a best interest plea.
(3) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENSE. All of the following:
a. Domestic violence in the first degree, as provided
in Section 13A-6-130, Code of Alabama 1975.
b. Domestic violence in the second degree, as provided
in Section 13A-6-131, Code of Alabama 1975.
c. Domestic violence in the third degree, as provided
in Section 13A-6-132, Code of Alabama 1975.
d. Domestic violence by strangulation or suffocation,
as provided in Section 13A-6-138, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 2

as provided in Section 13A-6-138, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB309 INTRODUCED
(4) PERSISTENT DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER or PERSISTENT
OFFENDER. An individual who has been convicted of a domestic
violence offense and has at least one prior conviction of a
domestic violence offense.
(5) REGISTRY. The registry of persistent domestic
violence offenders established within ALEA pursuant to Section
2.
Section 2. (a) There is created within ALEA a registry
of persistent domestic violence offenders. The registry must
be made available on ALEA's website at no cost to the public.
(b) The registry shall include all of the following
information:
(1) The persistent offender's full name and date of
birth.
(2) The persistent offender's conviction date and the
county or counties where each conviction occurred.
(3) A current photograph of the offender.
(c) The registry may not include:
(1) A persistent offender's address, Social Security
number, driver license number, or any other state or federal
identification number; or
(2) Any information that would identify the victim of a
domestic violence offense.
Section 3. (a)(1) If an individual is convicted of a
second or subsequent domestic violence offense, the court,
upon proof of any prior conviction of a domestic violence
offense, shall order the defendant to register with ALEA as a
persistent domestic violence offender.
Page 3

persistent domestic violence offender.
HB309 INTRODUCED
(2) The registration requirement applies to individuals
convicted of a second or subsequent domestic violence offense
that occurred on or after January 1, 2027, provided that a
prior conviction may have occurred before January 1, 2027.
(b)(1) If an individual is ordered to register as a
persistent domestic violence offender under subsection (a),
not later than seven days after the conviction, the court
clerk shall forward ALEA a certified copy of the qualifying
conviction and the date of birth of the persistent offender.
(2) If available after reasonable inquiry, the court
clerk shall also provide ALEA with a copy of the persistent
offender's driver license or other state or federal
identification, and any other identifying data that ALEA
determines is necessary to properly identify the persistent
offender and exclude innocent individuals, provided that only
100 the information specified in Section 2 may be published on the
101 registry.
102 (c) Notwithstanding Article 1, Chapter 5 of Title 13A,
103 Code of Alabama 1975, and in addition to any other punishment
104 that may be imposed for a conviction of a domestic violence
105 offense, a defendant required to register pursuant to this act
106 shall be assessed a one hundred fifty dollar ($150)
107 registration fee, which shall be paid to the clerk of the
108 court imposing the sentence. The clerk of the court shall:
109 (1) Retain fifty dollars ($50) of the fee for the
110 administration of this act, which must be reserved only for
111 the purposes authorized by this section; and
112 (2) Remit one hundred dollars ($100) to the Alabama
Page 4

(2) Remit one hundred dollars ($100) to the Alabama
HB309 INTRODUCED
113 Department of Economic and Community Affairs for deposit into
114 the Domestic Violence Trust Fund, created pursuant to Section
115 30-6-11, Code of Alabama 1975.
116 Section 4. (a) ALEA shall remove the name and other
117 identifying information of a persistent domestic violence
118 offender required to register under this section as follows:
119 (1) Five years after the date of the most recent
120 conviction of a domestic violence offense if the persistent
121 offender has one prior conviction of a domestic violence
122 offense.
123 (2) Seven years after the date of the most recent
124 conviction of a domestic violence offense if the persistent
125 offender has two prior convictions of domestic violence
126 offenses.
127 (3) Ten years after the date of the most recent
128 conviction of a domestic violence offense if the persistent
129 offender has three prior convictions of domestic violence
130 offenses.
131 (4) Twenty years after the date of the most recent
132 conviction of a domestic violence offense if the persistent
133 offender has four or more prior convictions of domestic
134 violence offenses.
135 (b) Any subsequent conviction of a domestic violence
136 offense after the persistent offender's initial registration
137 shall restart the calculation of time provided in subsection
138 (a).
139 Section 5. ALEA shall adopt rules to implement and
140 administer this section.
Page 5

administer this section.
HB309 INTRODUCED
141 Section 6. This act shall become effective on January
142 1, 2027.
Page 6